Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 6, chapter  661, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 4, chapter 113,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish a process for al-
locating available moneys in the Administrative Services Economic  Development Fund on a quar-
terly basis to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 1 to 13,  chapter 661, Oregon Laws
2021. The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in  any quarter, the moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are  insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to 13, chapter  661, Oregon Laws 2021, or any other 2021 Act, prior to making any other
allocations pursuant to sections 1  to 13, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, the department shall satisfy
lottery bond debt service obligations in the amount of [ $273,885,133] $271,357,713 for  outstanding
lottery bonds.
(3) After the lottery bond debt service  obligations described in subsection (2) of this section are
satisfied, if the remaining  moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are  insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to 13, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, the department shall reduce the  quarterly allo-
cations not described in subsection (2) of this section proportionately in amounts  sufficient to ac-
commodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 2.  Section 7, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by  section 5, chapter 113,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development  Fund, to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the
amount of [ $273,885,133] $271,357,713 for the purpose of paying, when due, the principal, interest and
premium, if any, on outstanding lottery bonds, as described in  section 6, chapter 661, Oregon Laws
2021.
SECTION 3.  Section 23, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, as  amended by section 12, chapter 113,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  (1)  There is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $36,000,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5545 (SB 5545-A) Page 1
(2) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for mental health treatment or  for pur-
poses related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early  intervention and treatment services, for
the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $18,000,000.
(3) There is allocated to the  Oregon Health Authority, for the health systems division, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount  of $4,500,000 for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
from the  Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of [ $250,527,400] $209,967,400, for deposit into the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund.
(5) There  is allocated to the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $13,500,000.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding and in lieu  of the percentage-based transfers of moneys
described in ORS 327.001 (4)(c), for the biennium ending  June 30, 2023, the Department of
Education shall distribute the moneys in the Fund for Student  Success established by ORS
327.001 as follows:
(1) $891,938,410 to the Student Investment Account established in ORS 327.175;
(2) $382,929,904 to the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS 327.250;
and
(3) $397,567,727 to the Early Learning Account established in ORS 327.269.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 27, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5545 (SB 5545-A) Page 2